Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-3110
Representation as a psychologist, defined.

Representation as a psychologist means that the person uses any title or description of services which incorporates the words psychology, psychological, or psychologist or which implies that he or she possesses expert qualification in any area of psychology or that the person offers to individuals or to groups of individuals services defined as the practice of psychology.

Laws 1994, LB 1210, § 72;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-1,206.10;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 1044.